Washington statutes.
RCW 43.103.070

Chair—Quorum—Meetings.

The council shall elect a chair and a vice chair from among its members. The chair shall not vote except in case of a tie vote. Seven members of the council shall constitute a quorum. The governor shall summon the council to its first meeting. Otherwise, meetings may be called by the chair and shall be called by him or her upon the written request of five members of the council. Conference calls by telephone are a proper form of meeting.

[ 1995 c 398 s 7; 1983 1st ex.s. c 16 s 7.]